Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.88.060

Effect of vote.

If the governor or the legislature fails to prepare and submit a notice of disapproval to the United States Congress within fifty-five days of the president's recommendation and a majority of the voters in the special election held pursuant to RCW 29A.88.020 favored such notice of disapproval, then the vote of the people shall be binding on the governor. The governor shall prepare and submit the notice of disapproval to the United States Congress pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 10136.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2206; 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 8. Formerly RCW 29.91.060.]